New York, session 2025-2026, S8265.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative intent. The legislature finds that cochlear 2 implants are critical for patients with hearing loss to maintain the 3 ability to hear. These devices, which are often life-changing, allow 4 individuals to improve their quality of life, integrate fully into their 5 communities, and perform daily activities. It is essential that individ- 6 uals who rely on cochlear implants have continuous access to the neces- 7 sary backup equipment to ensure uninterrupted use, including during 8 device upgrades and replacements. Currently, backup devices are provided 9 only with the initial implantation, but are not made available to 10 patients upon the upgrade or replacement of the implant after 3-5 years. 11 This bill seeks to address this gap in coverage and ensure that all 12 patients requiring cochlear implants have a backup device available 13 throughout the duration of their treatment. 14 § 2. Subsection (k) of section 3221 of the insurance law is amended 15 by adding a new paragraph 24 to read as follows: 16 (24) (A) Every large group policy which provides medical, major 17 medical, or similar comprehensive-type coverage shall provide the cover- 18 age for a backup cochlear implant device when prescribed by a health 19 care practitioner licensed, certified, or authorized under title eight 20 of the education law, and acting within their lawful scope of practice. 21 (B) Coverage of the backup device shall be provided as long as the 22 insured is actively using the cochlear implant, and for the duration of 23 the insured's need for the device, including any necessary upgrades. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10291-03-5 S. 8265--A 2 1 (C) The coverage provided under this paragraph may be subject to annu- 2 al deductibles, copayments and coinsurance as may be deemed appropriate 3 by the superintendent and shall be consistent with those imposed on 4 other similar benefits under the policy. 5 (D) For the purposes of this paragraph: 6 (i) "cochlear implant" means a medical device surgically implanted to 7 provide hearing to individuals with severe to profound sensorineural 8 hearing loss; and 9 (ii) "backup cochlear implant device" means an additional set of 10 external components of the cochlear implant, including a processor, in 11 the event that the primary device fails or requires maintenance. 12 § 3. Section 4303 of the insurance law is amended by adding a new 13 subsection (ww) to read as follows: 14 (ww) (1) Every large group policy which provides medical, major 15 medical, or similar comprehensive-type coverage shall provide the cover- 16 age for a backup cochlear implant device when prescribed by a health 17 care practitioner licensed, certified, or authorized under title eight 18 of the education law, and acting within their lawful scope of practice. 19 (2) Coverage of the backup device shall be provided as long as the 20 insured is actively using the cochlear implant, and for the duration of 21 the insured's need for the device, including any necessary upgrades. 22 (3) The coverage required under this subsection shall be subject to 23 annual deductibles, copayments and coinsurance as may be deemed appro- 24 priate by the superintendent and shall be consistent with those imposed 25 on other similar benefits under the contract. 26 (4) For the purposes of this subsection: 27 (A) "cochlear implant" means a medical device surgically implanted to 28 provide hearing to individuals with severe to profound sensorineural 29 hearing loss; and 30 (B) "backup cochlear implant device" means an additional set of 31 external components of the cochlear implant, including a processor, in 32 the event that the primary device fails or requires maintenance. 33 § 4. Severability. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, 34 section or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of competent 35 jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, impair, or 36 invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its operation 37 to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section or part thereof 38 directly involved in the controversy in which such judgment shall have 39 been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of the legislature 40 that this act would have been enacted even if such invalid provisions 41 had not been included herein. 42 § 5. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027 and shall apply to all 43 policies and contracts issued, renewed, modified, altered or amended on 44 or after such date.